Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 6. Fair Employment Practices
§ 495j.
Criminal history records; employment applications.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an employer shall not request criminal history record information on its initial employee application form. An employer may inquire about a prospective employee’s criminal history record during an interview or once the prospective employee has been deemed otherwise qualified for the position.

An employer may inquire about criminal convictions on an initial employee application form if the following conditions are met:
(b) (1) An employer may inquire about criminal convictions on an initial employee application form if the following conditions are met:

the prospective employee is applying for a position for which any federal or State law or regulation creates a mandatory or presumptive disqualification based on a conviction for one or more types of criminal offenses; or
(A) (i) the prospective employee is applying for a position for which any federal or State law or regulation creates a mandatory or presumptive disqualification based on a conviction for one or more types of criminal offenses; or

the employer or an affiliate of the employer is subject to an obligation imposed by any federal or State law or regulation not to employ an individual, in either one or more positions, who has been convicted of one or more types of criminal offenses; and

the questions on the application form are limited to the types of criminal offenses creating the disqualification or obligation.

An employer shall be permitted to inquire about criminal convictions on an initial employee application form pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection even if the federal or State law or regulation creating an obligation for the employer or its affiliate not to employ an individual who has been convicted of one or more types of criminal offenses also permits the employer or its affiliate to obtain a waiver that would allow the employer or its affiliate to employ such an individual.

If an employer inquires about a prospective employee’s criminal history record information, the prospective employee, if still eligible for the position under applicable federal or State law, must be afforded an opportunity to explain the information and the circumstances regarding any convictions, including postconviction rehabilitation.

An employer who violates the provisions of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to $100.00 for each violation.

As used in this section:

“Criminal history record” has the same meaning as set forth in

20 V.S.A. § 2056a

.

“Employee” has the same meaning as set forth in section 495d of this chapter.

“Employer” has the same meaning as set forth in section 495d of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 81

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 495k.
Accommodations for pregnancy-related conditions.

It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to fail to provide a reasonable accommodation for an employee’s pregnancy-related condition, unless it would impose an undue hardship on the employer.
(a) (1) It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to fail to provide a reasonable accommodation for an employee’s pregnancy-related condition, unless it would impose an undue hardship on the employer.

An employee with a pregnancy-related condition, regardless of whether the employee is an “individual with a disability” as defined in subdivision 495d(5) of this subchapter, shall have the same rights and be subject to the same standards with respect to the provision of a reasonable accommodation, pursuant to this subchapter, as a qualified individual with a disability as defined in subdivision 495d(6) of this subchapter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the rights, privileges, or remedies of an employee pursuant to federal or State law, a collective bargaining agreement, or an employment contract.

An employer shall post notice of the provisions of this section in a form provided by the Commissioner in a place conspicuous to employees at the employer’s place of business.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to indicate or deem that a pregnancy-related condition necessarily constitutes a disability.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 21

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 495
l
.
Social media account privacy; prohibitions.

As used in this section:

“Social media account” means an account with an electronic medium or service through which users create, share, and interact with content, including videos, still photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts, instant or text messages, e-mail, online services or accounts, or Internet website profiles or locations. “Social media account” does not include an account provided by an employer or intended to be used primarily on behalf of an employer.

“Specifically identified content” means data, information, or other content stored in a social media account that is identified with sufficient particularity to distinguish the individual piece of content being sought from any other data, information, or content stored in the account. “Specifically identified content” shall not include a username, password, or other means of authentication for the purpose of accessing an employee’s or applicant’s social media account.

An employer shall not require, request, or coerce an employee or applicant to do any of the following:

disclose a username, password, or other means of authentication, or turn over an unlocked personal electronic device for the purpose of accessing the employee’s or applicant’s social media account;

access a social media account in the presence of the employer;

divulge or present any content from the employee’s or applicant’s social media account; or

change the account or privacy settings of the employee’s or applicant’s social media account to increase third-party access to its contents.

An employer shall not require or coerce an employee or applicant to add anyone, including the employer, to his or her list of contacts associated with a social media account.

No agreement by an employee to waive his or her rights under this section shall be valid.

Nothing in this section shall preclude an employer from requesting an employee to share specifically identified content for the purpose of:
(e) (1) Nothing in this section shall preclude an employer from requesting an employee to share specifically identified content for the purpose of:

complying with the employer’s legal and regulatory obligations;

investigating an allegation of the unauthorized transfer or disclosure of an employer’s proprietary or confidential information or financial data through an employee’s or an applicant’s social media account; or

investigating an allegation of unlawful harassment, threats of violence in the workplace, or discriminatory or disparaging content concerning another employee.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit or restrict a law enforcement agency, as defined in

15 V.S.A. § 1151(5)

, from requesting or requiring:

an applicant to provide access to the applicant’s social media account as part of a screening or fitness determination during the hiring process; or

an employee to provide access to the employee’s social media account in relation to a continued fitness determination or an allegation or investigation of employee misconduct, a violation of policy, or a violation of law.

Nothing in this section shall restrict or otherwise prohibit a law enforcement agency, as defined in

15 V.S.A. § 1151(5)

, from retaining any social media account information acquired pursuant to this subsection, provided that the information shall be protected in accordance with law and the law enforcement agency’s policy.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an employer from complying with the requirements of State or federal law.

Nothing in this section shall preclude an employer from requesting or requiring an employee to provide a username or password that is necessary to access an employer-issued electronic device.

An employer shall not discharge or in any other manner retaliate against an employee who exercises or attempts to exercise his or her rights under this section. The provisions against retaliation in subdivision 495(a)(8) of this title and the penalty and enforcement provisions of section 495b of this title shall apply to this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 37

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 495m.
Salary history; employment applications.

An employer shall not:

inquire about or seek information regarding a prospective employee’s current or past compensation from either the prospective employee or a current or former employer of the prospective employee;

require that a prospective employee’s current or past compensation satisfy minimum or maximum criteria; or

determine whether to interview a prospective employee based on the prospective employee’s current or past compensation.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) of this section, if a prospective employee voluntarily discloses information about his or her current or past compensation, an employer may, after making an offer of employment with compensation to the prospective employee, seek to confirm or request that the prospective employee confirm that information.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an employer from:

inquiring about a prospective employee’s salary expectations or requirements; or

providing information about the wages, benefits, compensation, or salary offered in relation to a position.

As used in this section, “compensation” includes wages, salary, bonuses, benefits, fringe benefits, and equity-based compensation.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 495n.
Sexual harassment complaints; notice to Attorney General and Human Rights Commission.

A person that files a claim of sexual harassment pursuant to section 495b of this subchapter in which neither the Attorney General nor the Human Rights Commission is a party shall provide notice of the action to the Attorney General and the Human Rights Commission within 14 days after filing the complaint. The notice may be submitted electronically and shall include a copy of the filed complaint.

Upon receiving notice of a complaint in which the State is a party, the Human Rights Commission may elect to:
(b) (1) Upon receiving notice of a complaint in which the State is a party, the Human Rights Commission may elect to:

intervene in the action to seek remedies pursuant to section 495b of this subchapter; or

without becoming a party to the action, file a statement with the court addressing questions of law related to the provisions of this subchapter.

Upon receiving notice of a complaint in which the State is not a party, the Attorney General may elect to:

intervene in the action to seek remedies pursuant to section 495b of this subchapter; or

without becoming a party to the action, file a statement with the court addressing questions of law related to the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 496.
Legislative leave.

Any person who, in order to serve as a member of the General Assembly, must leave a full-time position in the employ of any employer, shall be entitled to a temporary or partial leave of absence for the purpose of allowing such employee to perform any official duty in connection with his or her elected office. Such leave of absence shall not cause loss of job status, seniority, or the right to participate in insurance and other employee benefits during the leave of absence.

An employee who intends to seek election to the General Assembly and to invoke, if elected, his or her right to a leave of absence pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, shall notify his or her employer of those intentions in writing within 10 days after filing the primary election nominating petition required by

17 V.S.A. § 2353

or of taking any other action required by 17 V.S.A. chapter 49, to place his or her name on a primary or general election ballot. An employee who fails to give notice to his or her employer as required by this section shall be deemed to have waived his or her right to a leave of absence under subsection (a) of this section.

An employer who contends that granting the leave of absence required by subsection (a) of this section will cause unreasonable hardship for his or her business may appeal for relief by letter to the Chair of the State Labor Relations Board created by

3 V.S.A. § 921

. The right to such appeal shall be waived unless it is filed within 14 days of receipt of the notice required by subsection (b) of this section. The appeal shall state the name of the employee and the reasons for the alleged unreasonable hardship. The remedy created by this subsection shall be the exclusive remedy for an employer who claims unreasonable hardship as a result of the application to him or her of subsection (a) of this section.

The Chair of the State Labor Relations Board, or any member of the Board designated by the Chair, shall serve as an arbitrator in any case appealed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. The proceedings shall include an opportunity for the employee to respond, orally or in writing, to the allegations of unreasonable hardship raised by the employer, and shall be conducted in accord with the rules of practice of the State Labor Relations Board. Within 30 days of receipt of a notice of appeal, the arbitrator shall issue an order, which shall be binding on both parties, either granting or denying the employer’s claim of unreasonable hardship. If the employer’s claim is granted, the employee shall not be entitled to the protection of subsection (a) of this section. In reaching his or her decision, the arbitrator shall consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:

the length of time the employee has been employed by the employer;

the number of employees in the employer’s business;

the nature of the employer’s business;

the nature of the position held by the employee and the ease or difficulty and cost of temporarily filling the position during the leave of absence; and

any agreement entered into between the employee and employer as a condition of employment.

This section is not applicable if the employer employs five or fewer persons immediately prior to the first day of the leave of absence.

Any attorney, party, witness, or juror who, while a member of and during sessions of the General Assembly, is assigned or scheduled to appear in any court of the State of Vermont shall be entitled to a leave of absence or postponement from such judicial duties when his or her duties in the Legislature are more compelling, for the purpose of allowing the member to perform any official duties in connection with his or her elected office. The leave of absence or postponement shall not prejudice the member or the cause involved.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1981, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 496a.
State funds; union organizing.

An employer that is the recipient of a grant of State funds in a single grant of more than $1,000.00 shall certify to the State that none of the funds will be used to interfere with or restrain the exercise of an employee’s rights with respect to unionization and upon request shall provide records to the Secretary of Administration which attest to such certification.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2013, No. 1

, § 94, eff. March 7, 2013.